Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1626
Authorization to operate; agent's permit; application; denial; reasons.

Upon review and consideration of an application for authorization to operate or for an agent's permit, if the department determines that the applicant fails to meet the standards established in the Private Postsecondary Career School Act, the department shall so notify the applicant, setting forth the reasons therefor in writing, and shall deny the application.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 26;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2826;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 26.